Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.aff
SFX A o       arisque         o         
SFX A o       arisne          o         
SFX A o       arisve          o         
SFX A o       atur            o         
SFX A o       aturque         o         
SFX A o       aturne          o         
SFX A o       aturve          o         
SFX A o       amur            o         
SFX A o       amurque         o         
SFX A o       amurne          o         
SFX A o       amurve          o         
SFX A o       amini           o         
SFX A o       aminique        o         
SFX A o       aminine         o         
SFX A o       aminive         o         
SFX A o       antur           o         
SFX A o       anturque        o         
SFX A o       anturne         o         
SFX A o       anturve         o         
SFX A o       abar            o         
SFX A o       abarque         o         
SFX A o       abarne          o         
SFX A o       abarve          o         
SFX A o       abaris          o         
SFX A o       abarisque       o         
SFX A o       abarisne        o         
SFX A o       abarisve        o         
SFX A o       abatur          o         
SFX A o       abaturque       o         
SFX A o       abaturne        o         
SFX A o       abaturve        o         
SFX A o       abamur          o         
SFX A o       abamurque       o         
SFX A o       abamurne        o         
SFX A o       abamurve        o         
SFX A o       abamini         o         
SFX A o       abaminique      o         
SFX A o       abaminine       o         
SFX A o       abaminive       o         
SFX A o       abantur         o         
SFX A o       abanturque      o         
SFX A o       abanturne       o         
SFX A o       abanturve       o         
SFX A o       abor            o         
SFX A o       aborque         o         
SFX A o       aborne          o         
SFX A o       aborve          o         
SFX A o       aberis          o         
SFX A o       aberisque       o         
SFX A o       aberisne        o         
SFX A o       aberisve        o         
SFX A o       abitur          o         
SFX A o       abiturque       o         
SFX A o       abiturne        o         
SFX A o       abiturve        o         
SFX A o       abimur          o         
SFX A o       abimurque       o         
SFX A o       abimurne        o         
SFX A o       abimurve        o         
SFX A o       abimini         o         
SFX A o       abiminique      o         
SFX A o       abiminine       o         
SFX A o       abiminive       o         
SFX A o       abuntur         o         
SFX A o       abunturque      o         
SFX A o       abunturne       o         
SFX A o       abunturve       o         
SFX A o       er              o         
SFX A o       erque           o         
SFX A o       erne            o         
SFX A o       erve            o         
SFX A o       eris            o         
SFX A o       erisque         o         
SFX A o       erisne          o         
SFX A o       erisve          o         
SFX A o       etur            o         
SFX A o       eturque         o         
SFX A o       eturne          o         
SFX A o       eturve          o         
SFX A o       emur            o         
SFX A o       emurque         o         
SFX A o       emurne          o         
SFX A o       emurve          o         
SFX A o       emini           o         
SFX A o       eminique        o         
SFX A o       eminine         o         
SFX A o       eminive         o         
SFX A o       entur           o         
SFX A o       enturque        o         
SFX A o       enturne         o         
SFX A o       enturve         o         
SFX A o       arer            o         
SFX A o       arerque         o         
SFX A o       arerne          o         
SFX A o       arerve          o         
SFX A o       areris          o         
SFX A o       arerisque       o         
SFX A o       arerisne        o         
SFX A o       arerisve        o         
SFX A o       aretur          o         
SFX A o       areturque       o         
SFX A o       areturne        o         
SFX A o       areturve        o         
SFX A o       aremur          o         
SFX A o       aremurque       o         
SFX A o       aremurne        o         
SFX A o       aremurve        o         
SFX A o       aremini         o         
SFX A o       areminique      o         
SFX A o       areminine       o         
SFX A o       areminive       o         
SFX A o       arentur         o         
SFX A o       arenturque      o         
SFX A o       arenturne       o         
SFX A o       arenturve       o         
SFX A o       ari             o         
SFX A o       arique          o         
SFX A o       arine           o         
SFX A o       arive           o         
SFX A o       andus           o         
SFX A o       andusque        o         
SFX A o       andusne         o         
SFX A o       andusve         o         
SFX A o       ande            o         
SFX A o       andeque         o         
SFX A o       andene          o         
SFX A o       andeve          o         
SFX A o       anda            o         
SFX A o       andaque         o         
SFX A o       andane          o         
SFX A o       andave          o         
SFX A o       andam           o         
SFX A o       andamque        o         
SFX A o       andamne         o         
SFX A o       andamve         o         
SFX A o       andae           o         
SFX A o       andaeque        o         
SFX A o       andaene         o         
SFX A o       andaeve         o         
SFX A o       andos           o         
SFX A o       andosque        o         
SFX A o       andosne         o         
SFX A o       andosve         o         
SFX A o       andorum         o         
SFX A o       andorumque      o         
SFX A o       andorumne       o         
SFX A o       andorumve       o         
SFX A o       andis           o         
SFX A o       andisque        o         
SFX A o       andisne         o         
SFX A o       andisve         o         
SFX A o       andas           o         
SFX A o       andasque        o         
SFX A o       andasne         o         
SFX A o       andasve         o         
SFX A o       andarum         o         
SFX A o       andarumque      o         
SFX A o       andarumne       o         
SFX A o       andarumve       o         
SFX A 0       or              or        
SFX A 0       r               or        
SFX A 0       rque            or        
SFX A 0       rne             or        
SFX A 0       rve             or        
SFX A or      aris            or        
SFX A or      arisque         or        
SFX A or      arisne          or        
SFX A or      arisve          or        
SFX A or      atur            or        
SFX A or      aturque         or        
SFX A or      aturne          or        
SFX A or      aturve          or        
SFX A or      amur            or        
SFX A or      amurque         or        
SFX A or      amurne          or        
SFX A or      amurve          or        
SFX A or      amini           or        
SFX A or      aminique        or        
SFX A or      aminine         or        
SFX A or      aminive         or        
SFX A or      antur           or        
SFX A or      anturque        or        
SFX A or      anturne         or        
SFX A or      anturve         or        
SFX A or      abar            or        
SFX A or      abarque         or        
SFX A or      abarne          or        
SFX A or      abarve          or        
SFX A or      abaris          or        
SFX A or      abarisque       or        
SFX A or      abarisne        or        
SFX A or      abarisve        or        
SFX A or      abatur          or        
SFX A or      abaturque       or        
SFX A or      abaturne        or        
