Other/Precision Software/Precision Lang Suite/Editor/Extras/Hunspell/Dictionaries/la.dic
abiuro/APS
abomino/AP
accelero/APS
acclamo/APS
accumulo/APS
accuso/APS
adaequo/APS
adapto/APS
adclamo/APS
adfirmo/APS
adflo/APS
adfrico/A
adhortor/AS
adiuvo/A
adlevo/APS
admiror/AS
adnumero/APS
adopto/APS
adplico/APS
adprobo/APS
adrogo/APS
adsentor/AS
adsigno/APS
adsto/A
adtrecto/APS
adulor/AS
advento/APS
adversor/AS
aedifico/APS
aemulor/AS
aequepondero/APS
aequiparo/APS
aequipondero/A
aestuo/APS
afflicto/APS
aggemino/APS
agino/APS
alieno/APS
alligo/APS
altercor/AS
altero/Aq
amplifico/APS
anhelo/APS
antisto/ABPS
apparo/APS
appello/ABPS
apporto/APS
appropinquo/APS
arbitro/A
architector/A
arieto/APS
aro/APS
aspecto/APS
aspernor/AS
aspiro/APS
assimilo/APS
associo/APS
aucupor/AS
auguror/AS
ausculor/AS
autumo/APS
aversor/AS
avolo/APS
badizo/APS
basio/APS
bello/APS
brevio/APS
caelo/APS
calcio/APS
calculo/AS
calumnio/A
capto/APS
causor/AS
cavo/APS
celero/APS
ceno/APS
certo/APS
circino/APS
circulor/A
circumdo/AS
circumvallo/APS
circumvolo/APS
cito/APS
coacervo/APS
coagmento/APS
coarcto/APS
cogito/APS
collatero/APS
colligo/ABPS
colloco/APS
collustro/APS
comissor/AS
comitor/A
commeleto/APS
commeo/APS
commiseror/AS
commonstro/APS
commostro/APS
commuto/APS
compello/ABPS
comploro/APS
comprobo/APS
concateno/APS
concesso/APS
concito/APS
concomitor/A
concremo/APS
conculco/APS
concurso/APS
condemno/APS
confirmo/APS
conflo/APS
conformo/APS
conglobo/APS
coniecto/APS
coniuro/APS
conlocare/APS
connoto/APS
conor/A
consaucio/APS
conservo/APS
consigno/APS
consono/A
conspisso/APS
consulto/APS
consydero/APS
contemplor/AS
contestor/A
contumulo/APS
convolo/APS
corrivo/APS
crepo/A
cubo/APS
curo/APS
deambulo/APS
declaro/APS
decubo/A
defenso/APS
degusto/APS
delecto/APS
deligo/ABPS
demano/APS
denomino/APS
deploro/APS
deproelior/AS
derivo/APS
despecto/APS
desydero/APS
deturbo/APS
devoro/APS
diffamo/APS
dilato/APS
discordo/APS
dispenso/APS
dissigno/APS
disto/APS
do/A
doto/APS
duro/APS
efflagito/APS
eiuro/APS
elixo/APS
emancipo/APS
emigro/APS
eno/APS
enuntio/APS
erogo/APS
evacuo/APS
evoco/APS
exalto/APS
exaspero/APS
exclamo/APS
excuso/APS
exercito/APS
exonero/APS
exosculor/AS
expio/APS
exploro/APS
exsatio/APS
exspatior/A
exsulto/APS
exturbo/APS
fabrico/APS
fascino/APS
figuro/APS
flagro/APS
fluito/APS
formido/APS
fragro/APS
frico/APS
fumigo/APS
gelo/APS
gesto/APS
grator/AS
gusto/APS
habito/APS
hiberno/APS
honoro/APS
iaculor/AS
illustro/APS
immolo/APS
impero/APS
importo/APS
imputo/APS
incito/APS
incoho/APS
incubo/A
incurvo/APS
indignor/A
infimo/APS
informo/APS
initio/APS
inno/APS
inrito/APS
insinuo/APS
instauro/APS
insufflo/APS
intento/APS
interpretor/AS
inumbro/APS
invoco/APS
irrigo/APS
iudico/APS
ivuo/A
laetifico/APS
langueo/ABPS
latito/APS
laxo/APS
libero/APS
lineo/APS
luctor/AS
luxo/APS
maculo/APS
mando/APS
maturo/APS
mendico/APS
metor/A
ministro/APS
miror/AS
moderor/AS
moror/A
munero/APS
mutito/APS
navigo/APS
negotior/AS
nomino/APS
nudo/APS
nuto/APS
oberro/AS
obiurigo/APS
oblittero/APS
obsigno/APS
obtestor/AS
obversor/AS
occulto/APS
offoco/APS
operor/AS
opsto/APS
orbo/APS
oscito/APS
pabulor/AS
participo/APS
penetro/APS
percontor/A
pererro/APS
pergraecor/AS
permeo/APS
peroro/APS
persono/APS
pertrunco/APS
pervigilo/APS
pio/APS
plago/APS
pondero/APS
poto/APS
praedor/AS
praegusto/APS
praeministro/APS
praenoto/APS
praesto/APS
prenso/APS
procreo/APS
profligo/APS
promulgo/APS
propino/APS
prorogo/APS
provoco/APS
pullulo/APS
quadruplico/AS
quasso/APS
radio/APS
recipero/APS
recordor/AS
recupero/APS
redulcero/APS
refrigero/APS
religo/APS
remuneror/A
reporto/APS
reputo/APS
residuo/A
respiro/APS
retracto/APS
rigo/APS
roro/APS
sacco/APS
salut/APS
sanguino/APS
savior/AS
sector/AS
separo/APS
sicco/APS
socio/APS
somnio/APS
speculor/AS
spolio/APS
stillo/APS
sto/A
subcubo/AS
sublimo/APS
subrogo/APS
succlamo/APS
supero/APS
supprimo/ABPS
sustento/APS
tempto/APS
tergiversor/AS
testor/AS
tracto/APS
transporto/APS
trucido/APS
turbo/APSq
unctito/APS
vacillo/APS
vario/APS
velifico/APS
vendito/APS
ventilo/APS
verso/APS
vexo/APS
vindico/APS
vitupero/APS
volo/ABPSq
zelo/APS
pernocto/A
